Idaho, session 2025, S1208.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
DIVISION OF YOUTH SAFETY AND PERMANENCY:
A. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $3,009,200 $3,098,600 $56,900 $6,164,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 2,753,000 548,600 52,200 3,353,800
TOTAL $5,762,200 $3,647,200 $109,100 $9,518,500
B. FOSTER & ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $7,609,900 $7,609,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 4,117,300 4,117,300
TOTAL $11,727,200 $11,727,200
DIVISIONTOTAL $5,762,200 $3,647,200 $109,100 $11,727,200 $21,245,700
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION FOR THE DIVISION OF YOUTH SAFETY AND PER-
MANENCY. In addition to any other authorization provided by law, the full-
time equivalent position authorization provided to the Department of Health
and Welfare for the Division of Youth Safety and Permanency is hereby in-
creased by sixty-three (63.00) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 3. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, the Division of Youth Safety and Perma-
nency may transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant
to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 4. FOSTER PROGRAM LICENSING STAFF. Of the appropriation made
in Section 1 of this act, $663,000 and, of the additional full-time equiva-
lent positions authorized in Section 2 of this act, eight (8.00) full-time
equivalent positions are directly tied to the Department of Health and Wel-
fare's ability to achieve a one-to-one (1:1) ratio of foster families to fos-
ter children by January 1, 2026. If the Department of Health and Welfare does
not achieve such a ratio, the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee shall
consider if the funding and full-time equivalent positions should be removed
prior to setting the fiscal year 2027 program maintenance budget. Each re-
port shall include quantifiable data on actual households and children in
the foster care system, sustainability plans to achieve a one-to-one (1:1)
ratio, and clear documentation on adjustments made from prior plans to ac-
count for corrections and adjustments needed to achieve the desired ratio.
The Department of Health and Welfare shall provide the first report to the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office no
later than September 15, 2025, and a second report no later than at least
one (1) week prior to a Fall committee interim tour, or November 1, 2025,
whichever occurs first.
SECTION 5. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-


islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Divi-
sion of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes related
to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to standard
federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost alloca-
tion plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency support
staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 262, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Fos-
ter and Assistance Payments program the following amounts to be expended for
trustee and benefit payments from the listed funds for the period July 1,
2024, through June 30, 2025:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund $8,868,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 5,258,700
TOTAL $14,126,900
SECTION 8. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, the Division of Youth Safety and Perma-
nency may transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant
to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 7 and 8 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.